test/src/morphology/N-syi_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - си: # Noun 'hole / (fin) reikä' - partial paradigm /Type 1/ - syí
     си+N+Sg+Nom: си
     си+N+Sg+Acc: симʼ
     си+N+Sg+Gen: сиʼ
     си+N+Sg+Dat: синʼ
     си+N+Sg+Loc: [сихина, сихиня]
     си+N+Sg+Abl: сихид
     си+N+Sg+Pros: [сивна, сивня]
     си+N+Du+Nom: сихиʼ
     си+N+Du+Acc: сихиʼ
     си+N+Du+Gen: сихиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Nom: сиˮ
     си+N+Pl+Acc: си
     си+N+Pl+Gen: сиˮ
     си+N+Pl+Dat: сихиˮ
     си+N+Pl+Loc: [сихиˮна, сихиˮня]
     си+N+Pl+Abl: сихит
     си+N+Pl+Pros: [сиˮимна, сиˮимня]
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: сив
     си+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: сив
     си+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: син
     си+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: сихин
     си+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [сихинан, сихинян]
     си+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: сихидан
     си+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [сивнан, сивнян]
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: сихиюн
     си+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: сихиюн
     си+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: сихиюн
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: син
     си+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: син
     си+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: сиˮин
     си+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: сихиˮн
     си+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [сихиˮнан, сихиˮнян]
     си+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: сихитан
     си+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [сиˮимнан, сиˮимнян]
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: сир
     си+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: симд
     си+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: синд
     си+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: сихинд
     си+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [сихинанд, сихинянд]
     си+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: сихиданд
     си+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: [сивнанд, сивнянд]
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: сихиюд
     си+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: сихиюд
     си+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: сихиют
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: сид
     си+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: сид
     си+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: сит
     си+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: сихит
     си+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [сихиˮнат, сихиˮнят]
     си+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: сихитат
     си+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: [сиˮимнат, сиˮимнят]
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [сида, сидя]
     си+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: [симда, симдя]
     си+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: [синда, синдя]
     си+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: сихинда
     си+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [сихинанда, сихинянда]
     си+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: сихиданда
     си+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: [сивнанда, сивнянда]
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: сихиюда
     си+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: сихиюда
     си+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: сихиюта
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [сида, сидя]
     си+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [сида, сидя]
     си+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [сита, ситя]
     си+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: сихита
     си+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [сихиˮната, сихиˮнята]
     си+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: сихитата
     си+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: [сиˮимната, сиˮимнята]
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: симиʼ
#     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: сими
     си+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: симиʼ
#     си+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: сими
     си+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: синиʼ
#     си+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: сини
     си+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: сихиниʼ
#     си+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: сихини
     си+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [сихинаниʼ, сихиняниʼ]
#     си+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: [сихинани, сихиняни]
     си+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: сихиданиʼ
#     си+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: сихидани
     си+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: [сивнаниʼ, сивняниʼ]
#     си+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: [сивнани, сивняни]
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: сихиюниʼ
#     си+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: сихиюни
     си+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: сихиюниʼ
#     си+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: сихиюни
     си+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: сихиюниʼ
#     си+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: сихиюни
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: синиʼ
#     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: сини
     си+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: синиʼ
#     си+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: сини
     си+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: сиˮниʼ
#     си+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: сиˮни
     си+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: сихиˮниʼ
#     си+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: сихиˮни
     си+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [сихиˮнаниʼ, сихиˮняниʼ]
#     си+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: [сихиˮнани, сихиˮняни]
     си+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: сихитаниʼ
#     си+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: сихитани
     си+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: [сиˮимнаниʼ, сиˮимняниʼ]
#     си+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: [сиˮимнани, сиˮимняни]
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: сириʼ
     си+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: симдиʼ
     си+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: синдиʼ
     си+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: сихиндиʼ
     си+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [сихинандиʼ, сихиняндиʼ]
     си+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: сихидандиʼ
     си+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: [сивнандиʼ, сивняндиʼ]
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: сихиюдиʼ
     си+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: сихиюдиʼ
     си+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: сихиютиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: сидиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: сидиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ситиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: сихитиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [сихиˮнатиʼ, сихиˮнятиʼ]
     си+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: сихитатиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: [сиˮимнатиʼ, сиˮимнятиʼ]
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: сидиʼ
     си+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: симдиʼ
     си+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: синдиʼ
     си+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: сихиндиʼ
     си+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [сихинандиʼ, сихиняндиʼ]
     си+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: сихидандиʼ
     си+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: [сивнандиʼ, сивняндиʼ]
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: сихиюдиʼ
     си+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: сихиюдиʼ
     си+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: сихиютиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: сидиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: сидиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ситиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: сихитиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [сихиˮнатиʼ, сихиˮнятиʼ]
     си+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: сихитатиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: [сиˮимнатиʼ, сиˮимнятиʼ]
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: сиваˮ
     си+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: сиваˮ
     си+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: синаˮ
     си+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: сихинаˮ
     си+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [сихинанаˮ, сихинянаˮ]
     си+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: сихиданаˮ
     си+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: [сивнанаˮ, сивнянаˮ]
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: сихиюнаˮ
     си+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: сихиюнаˮ
     си+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: сихиюнаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: синаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: синаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: сиˮнаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: сихиˮнаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [сихиˮнанаˮ, сихиˮнянаˮ]
     си+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: сихитанаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: [сиˮимнанаˮ, сиˮимнянаˮ]
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: сираˮ
     си+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: симдаˮ
     си+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: синдаˮ
     си+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: сихиндаˮ
     си+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [сихинандаˮ, сихиняндаˮ]
     си+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: сихидандаˮ
     си+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: [сивнандаˮ, сивняндаˮ]
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: сихиюдаˮ
     си+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: сихиюдаˮ
     си+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: сихиютаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: сидаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: сидаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ситаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: сихитаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [сихиˮнатаˮ, сихиˮнятаˮ]
     си+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: сихитатаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: [сиˮимнатаˮ, сиˮимнятаˮ]
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: [сидоʼ, сидёʼ]
     си+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: [симдоʼ, симдёʼ]
     си+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: [синдоʼ, синдёʼ]
     си+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: сихиндоʼ
     си+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [сихинандоʼ, сихиняндоʼ]
     си+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: сихидандоʼ
     си+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: [сивнандоʼ, сивняндоʼ]
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: сихиюдоʼ
     си+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: сихиюдоʼ
     си+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: сихиютоʼ
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [сидоʼ, сидёʼ]
     си+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: [сидоʼ, сидёʼ]
     си+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: [ситоʼ, ситёʼ]
     си+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: сихитоʼ
     си+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [сихиˮнатоʼ, сихиˮнятоʼ]
     си+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: сихитатоʼ
     си+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: [сиˮимнатоʼ, сиˮимнятоʼ]
     си+N+Pred+Abs: сид
     си+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [сидав, сидув]
     си+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [сидав, сидув]
     си+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: сидан
     си+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: сидар
     си+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: сидамд
     си+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: сиданд
     си+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [сидада, сидда]
     си+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: сидамда
     си+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: сиданда
     си+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [сидамиʼ, сидмиʼ]
#     си+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [сидами, сидми]
     си+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [сидамиʼ, сидмиʼ]
#     си+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [сидами, сидми]
     си+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [сиданиʼ, сидниʼ]
#     си+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [сидани, сидни]
     си+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [сидариʼ, сидриʼ]
     си+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: сидамдиʼ
     си+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: сидандиʼ
     си+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [сидадиʼ, сиддиʼ]
     си+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: сидамдиʼ
     си+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: сидандиʼ
     си+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [сидаваˮ, сидваˮ]
     си+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [сидаваˮ, сидваˮ]
     си+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [сиданаˮ, сиднаˮ]
     си+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [сидараˮ, сидраˮ]
     си+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: сидамдаˮ
     си+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: сидандаˮ
     си+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [сидадоʼ, сиддоʼ]
     си+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: сидамдоʼ
     си+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: сидандоʼ
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: сидмʼ
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: син
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: си
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: синиʼ
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: сидиʼ
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сихиʼ
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: сиваˮ
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: сидаˮ
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: сиˮ
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: сидамзь
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: синась
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сись
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: сининзь
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: сидинзь
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сихинзь
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: сиваць
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: сидаць
     си+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: сиць
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сив
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сир
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [сида, сидя]
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: симиʼ
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сириʼ
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сидиʼ
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сиваˮ
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сираˮ
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [сидоʼ, сидёʼ]
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сивась
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сирась
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [сидась, сидясь]
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: симинзь
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сиринзь
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сидинзь
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сиваць
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сираць
     си+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [сидонзь, сидёнзь]
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сихиюн
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сихиюд
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сихиюда
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сихиюниʼ
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сихиюдиʼ
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сихиюдиʼ
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сихиюнаˮ
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сихиюдаˮ
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сихиюдоʼ
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сихиюнась
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сихиюдась
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сихиюдась
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сихиюнинзь
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сихиюдинзь
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сихиюдинзь
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сихиюнаць
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сихиюдаць
     си+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сихиюдонзь
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: син
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: сид
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [сида, сидя]
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: синиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: сидиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: сидиʼ
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: синаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: сидаˮ
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [сидоʼ, сидёʼ]
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: синась
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: сидась
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [сидась, сидясь]
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: сининзь
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: сидинзь
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: сидинзь
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: синаць
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: сидаць
     си+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [сидонзь, сидёнзь]
     си+N+Tra: сиӈэ
     си+N+Car: сисиˮ
     си+N+Equ: сидремʼ
     си+N+Equ+Lat: сидревʼ
